Utah statutes.
53-8-213.   Special function officer status for certain employees -- Retirement provisions.

(1)  The commissioner may designate an employee of the Utah Highway Patrol Division as a special function officer, as defined in Section 53-13-105, for the purpose of enforcing all laws relating to vehicle parts and equipment, including the provisions of this part and Title 41, Chapter 6a, Part 16, Vehicle Equipment.

(2)  Notwithstanding Section 49-15-201, a special function officer designated under this section may not become or be designated as a member of the Public Safety Retirement Systems.

